Washington statutes.
RCW 19.373.060

Processors.

(1)(a)(i) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, beginning March 31, 2024, a processor may process consumer health data only pursuant to a binding contract between the processor and the regulated entity or the small business that sets forth the processing instructions and limit the actions the processor may take with respect to the consumer health data it processes on behalf of the regulated entity or the small business.

(ii) A processor may process consumer health data only in a manner that is consistent with the binding instructions set forth in the contract with the regulated entity or the small business.

(b) A processor shall assist the regulated entity or the small business by appropriate technical and organizational measures, insofar as this is possible, in fulfilling the regulated entity's and the small business's obligations under this chapter.

(c) If a processor fails to adhere to the regulated entity's or the small business's instructions or processes consumer health data in a manner that is outside the scope of the processor's contract with the regulated entity or the small business, the processor is considered a regulated entity or a small business with regard to such data and is subject to all the requirements of this chapter with regard to such data.

(2) A small business must comply with this section beginning June 30, 2024.

[ 2023 c 191 s 8.]